District of Columbia statutes.
32-332

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-332, § 3, 52 DCR 1989
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Rehabilitation Services Program Establishment Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-138, May 21, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 5055).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Rehabilitation Services Program Establishment Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 14-290, April 4, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 5848).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Rehabilitation Services Program Establishment Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-99, March 10, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3619).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Rehabilitation Services Program Establishment Temporary Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-250, March 17, 2003, law notification 52 DCR 4126).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3 of Rehabilitation Services Program Establishment Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-284, February 25, 2002, 49 DCR 2311).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3 of Rehabilitation Services Program Establishment Second Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-596, January 7, 2003, 50 DCR 650).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3 of Rehabilitation Services Program Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-72, April 16, 2003, 50 DCR 3612).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3 of Rehabilitation Services Program Establishment Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-235, November 25, 2003, 50 DCR 10737).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3 of Rehabilitation Services Program Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-358, February 19, 2004, 51 DCR 2576).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3 of Rehabilitation Services Program Establishment Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-559, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 10378).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3 of Rehabilitation Services Program Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-9, January 19, 2005, 52 DCR 2694).